src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 44B
 +Inf:%>trengast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>trengst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>trongst # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>trungist # ;

LEXICON 44BK1
 +Inf:%>trengast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>trengest # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>trongst # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>trungist # ;

LEXICON 44C
 +Inf:%>slåst # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>slåst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>slost # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>slegest # ;

LEXICON 44CK1
 +Inf:%>slåst # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>slæst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>slost # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>slegest # ;

LEXICON 44D
 +Inf:%>slåst # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>slåst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>slost # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>slegist # ;

LEXICON 44DK1
 +Inf:%>slåst # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>slæst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>slost # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>slegist # ;

LEXICON 44E
 +Inf:%>slåst # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>slåst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>slost # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>slåst # ;

LEXICON 44F
 +Inf:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ist # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eist # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>iest # ;

LEXICON 44FK1
 +Inf:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>iest # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eist # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>iest # ;

LEXICON 44G
 +Inf:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ist # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eist # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>iist # ;

LEXICON 44GK1
 +Inf:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>iest # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eist # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>iist # ;

LEXICON 44H
 +Inf:%>gåast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>gåst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>gjekst # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>gåst # ;

LEXICON 44I
 +Inf:%>låst # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>læst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>lest # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>låst # ;

LEXICON 44J
 +Inf:%>aast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>est # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>óst # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>aest # ;

LEXICON 44JK1
 +Inf:%>aast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eest # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>óst # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>aest # ;

LEXICON 44K
 +Inf:%>aast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>est # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>óst # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>aist # ;

LEXICON 44KK1
 +Inf:%>aast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eest # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>óst # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>aist # ;

LEXICON 44L
 +Inf:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>est # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>odest # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ost # ;

LEXICON 44LK1
 +Inf:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eest # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>odest # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ost # ;

LEXICON 44N
 +Inf:%>gåas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>gås # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>gjeks # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>gås # ;

LEXICON 44O
 +Inf:%>gåas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>gås # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>giks # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>gås # ;

LEXICON 44P
 +Inf:%>jas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jes # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>des # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>s # ;

LEXICON 44Q
 +Inf:%>sjåas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ses # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>sågs # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ses # ;

LEXICON 44R
 +Inf:%>as|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ddes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ds # ;

LEXICON 44S
 +Inf:%>as|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ddes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ts # ;

LEXICON 44T
 +Inf:%>tas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>tes # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>tes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>s # ;

LEXICON 44U
 +Inf:%>jas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jes # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>tes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>s # ;

LEXICON 44V
 +Inf:%>aas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>os # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ees # ;

LEXICON 44VK1
 +Inf:%>aas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eest # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>os # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ees # ;

LEXICON 44W
 +Inf:%>aas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>os # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>eis # ;

LEXICON 44WK1
 +Inf:%>aas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eest # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>os # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>eis # ;

LEXICON 44X
 +Inf:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>est # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>adest # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ast # ;

LEXICON 44Y
 +Inf:%>oas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øs # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>odes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>os # ;

LEXICON 44Z
 +Inf:%>givast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>givst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>gavst # ;

LEXICON 44ZK1
 +Inf:%>givas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>givs # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>gavs # ;

LEXICON 44ZZ
 +Inf:%>gangast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>gjengst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>gjekst # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>gjengest # ;
