src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
bitast+V:b 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=7441
forfarast+V:forf 44J ; ! LEMMA_ID=24229
forgåast+V:forg 44H ; ! LEMMA_ID=24376
gjerast+V:gj 44L ; ! LEMMA_ID=30529
illtrivast+V:illtr 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=40615
låst+V:l 44I ; ! LEMMA_ID=58546
mistrivast+V:mistr 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=61342
omfarast+V:omf 44J ; ! LEMMA_ID=66490
omgåast+V:omg 44H ; ! LEMMA_ID=66536
rivast+V:r 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=75350
samfarast+V:samf 44J ; ! LEMMA_ID=77378
slitast+V:sl 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=85734
slåst+V:sl 44E ; ! LEMMA_ID=86042
stortrivast+V:stortr 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=90483
trivast+V:tr 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=99279
ugjerast+V:ugj 44L ; ! LEMMA_ID=102956
utrivast+V:utr 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=106316
vantrivast+V:vantr 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=107559
vederfarast+V:vederf 44J ; ! LEMMA_ID=108448
givast+V:g 44Z ; ! LEMMA_ID=123244
gangast+V:g 44ZZ ; ! LEMMA_ID=126921
alast+V:alast 44J ; ! LEMMA_ID=127547
skrivast+V:skr 44F ; ! LEMMA_ID=137028
